Washington statutes.
RCW 10.96.010

Definitions.

The definitions in this section apply throughout this chapter unless the context clearly requires otherwise.

(1) "Adverse result" includes one or more of the following possible consequences:

(a) Danger to the life or physical safety of an individual;

(b) A flight from prosecution;

(c) The destruction of, potential loss of, or tampering with evidence;

(d) The intimidation of potential witnesses;

(e) Jeopardy to an investigation or undue delay of a trial.

(2) "Applicant" means a law enforcement officer, prosecuting attorney, deputy or special deputy prosecuting attorney, or defense attorney who is seeking criminal process under RCW 10.96.020.

(3) "Criminal process" means a search warrant or legal process issued pursuant to RCW 10.79.015 and CrR 2.3; any process issued pursuant to chapter 9.73, 9A.82, 10.27, or 10.29 RCW; and any other legal process signed by a judge of the superior court and issued in a criminal matter which allows the search for or commands production of records that are in the actual or constructive possession of the recipient, regardless of whether the recipient or the records are physically located within the state.

(4) "Defense attorney" means an attorney of record for a person charged with a crime when the attorney is seeking the issuance of criminal process for the defense of the criminal case.

(5) "Properly served" means delivery by hand or in a manner reasonably allowing for proof of delivery if delivered by United States mail, overnight delivery service, or facsimile to the recipient addressee of criminal process.

(6) "Recipient" means a person, as defined in RCW 9A.04.110, or a business, as defined in RCW 5.45.010, that has conducted business or engaged in transactions occurring at least in part in this state upon whom criminal process issued under this chapter is properly served.

[ 2008 c 21 s 2.]